Skip to main content
Discover insights from our 2025 Global Enterprise Resilience Report
Download now
Everbridge global privacy notice
LAST UPDATED: November 14, 2024
Download PDF
PLEASE READ THIS PRIVACY NOTICE CAREFULLY
This Privacy Notice describes the practices of Everbridge, Inc. (together with its subsidiaries and affiliates, “Everbridge,” “we,” “us,” and “our”) This Privacy Notice describes how we collect, process, and share your personal data, and the rights and choices that are available to you with respect to your personal data.
Privacy Notice accordingly. Changes to this Privacy Notice are effective at the time they are published, and therefore we encourage you to review this Privacy Notice from time to time. Additionally, this Privacy Notice may be supplemented or amended from time to time by other notices posted elsewhere, including on specific pages of our Platform and when you use certain Services.
This Privacy Notice is available here:
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-global-privacy-notice
.
Applicability of this Privacy Notice to Our Services
. This Privacy Notice applies to the personal data that Everbridge processes, including the personal data we collect when you interact with us in certain contexts online, for example, when you access or use our websites (including without limitation
www.everbridge.com
, manager.everbridge.net,
www.xmatters.com
,
flight-safe.com
,
www.bestinresilience.com
,
www.redskye911.com
,
www.nixle.com
, and
www.infiniteblue.com
), mobile sites, browser-based and mobile applications, platforms, and certain Everbridge products (including Everbridge Travel Protector, Everbridge Assist, Anvil Riskmatics, Infinite Blue, and Everbridge Business Continuity in the Cloud), in each case that link to this Privacy Notice (all of the foregoing collectively referred to herein as the “Platform”), or when you communicate with us via email, text message, or interact with our digital advertisements. It also includes the personal data we collect when you interact with us in certain contexts offline, for example, when you see us at conferences or trade shows, or when you communicate with our sales or support service teams in person, via phone, or by postal mail. In this Privacy Notice, we refer to the products and services we provide, both online (including via the Platform) and offline, as “Services.”
This Notice does not apply to personal data not processed by Everbridge. In some cases, our Platform processes personal data on behalf of our customers, where Everbridge acts as a service provider to our business customers (sometimes referred to as the data controller). In such case, Everbridge’s customer is the data controller, and we process your personal data in accordance with the agreement we have with the customer. If you are a client of an Everbridge customer and have questions about the privacy practices of such customer, including information we may process on their behalf, please contact them directly or refer to their privacy notice(s).
Notice of Privacy Practices for Medical Information
. Please note that certain Everbridge Services may involve the provision of health care services and the processing of your medical information. Our use and disclosure of your medical information in this context, and your rights with respect to such medical information, are described in Everbridge’s Notice of Privacy Practices for Medical Information, which is available here,
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-privacy-practices-for-medical.
Nixle Services-Specific Data Practices. The following additional terms and limitations apply to the manner in which Everbridge collects and processes personal data when you interact with or use the Everbridge Nixle Services, which may be available via mobile sites, browser-based and mobile applications, website integrations, widgets, text messages and other platforms (collectively, the “Nixle Service”) (“Nixle Personal Data”). We, our service providers, and our business partners, only process Nixle personal data for the purpose of performance of the Nixle Service, communications (including responding to anonymous tips and other messages submitted to the Nixle Service), improving the Nixle Service, personalization, security and fraud prevention, and as needed to comply with legal obligations (each as described more fully in the “How We Use Your Personal Data” section of the privacy notice below). Everbridge does not:
sell Nixle Personal Data; or
share Nixle Personal Data with third parties for their own independent use or advertising purposes.
Staff and Candidate Privacy Notices.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to personal data processed by Everbridge in its role as an employer or prospective employer. If you are an Everbridge employee or candidate for employment and would like to review the notices applicable in these circumstances, please email privacy@everbridge.com.
1.   Personal Data We Process
The personal data we process may include:
Device Information:
When you access or use our Platform (including our mobile applications), interact with our digital advertisements, or open our emails, we may learn information about your browser or device (e.g., name or type, version, settings, etc.), IP address, unique online identifiers (e.g., MAC address, mobile device identifiers, etc.), internet service provider or mobile network information, the name and version of your operating system, referring and exit pages, and the date and time of your visit.
Usage Data:
We process information about your interactions with our Platform (including interactions with our mobile applications), digital advertisements, and emails, including the pages you visit and how often and for how long you use the Platform, links or buttons you click, the search terms you enter, performance data, recordings or event logging of your sessions, and other similar interactions with our Platform, emails, or digital advertisements.
Non-Precise Location Data:
When you access or use our Platform (including our mobile applications), interact with our digital advertisements, or open our emails, we may learn your non- precise geographic location, including by collecting your IP address or other Device Information.
Please note that, in connection with certain Services (e.g., our travel risk management services and our Nixle Services), and where you have expressly enabled a relevant feature within your mobile device’s settings, we may process Precise Location Data (for more information, see below under “Sensitive Data”).
Contact Information:
We may process your contact information, including identifiers such as your first and last name, postal address, telephone number, and email address.
Professional and Employment Information:
We may process information about your employment, including your employer’s name and your title, professional credentials, institutional affiliations, and business contact information.
Demographic Information:
We may process demographic details about you such as your birthdate or age, gender, social media information and profile data, and similar demographic details.
Preferences:
We may process information about your preferences, including with respect to how you prefer to communicate with us, and whether you’d like to subscribe to our newsletter and marketing communications.
Payment Card Information, Payment Details, and Purchasing History:
Our third-party service providers process your payment card information and other payment details if you purchase our Services. We may also process information about other products or services you’ve purchased or considered purchasing.
Call Records, Email Records, and Chat Logs:
If you call, text, email, submit questions or comments via our “Contact Us” web form, or use the “chatbot” feature of our Platform to contact our sales or support service representatives (or other agents or representatives of Everbridge), or reach out to us via a social media platform, or contact us via other forms of inbound communication, we may keep records of those conversations including any information you have provided to us in connection with such conversation.
Submitted Content:
We process any personal data submitted to us via the Platform, email, or postal mail, including any personal data provided in open text fields, in your written feedback, product reviews and testimonials, responses to surveys, or other information, photos, or videos. “Submitted Content” also includes personal data that you share with us through your mobile device’s settings, such as when you allow our mobile applications to access photos, files, or documents on your device, or create audio or video recordings (e.g., when you use our mobile application to record what is happening around you when you feel unsafe).
Account Credentials:
If you register an account with Everbridge, we process your account credentials, including your account log-in name and password. Please note that in some cases, your employer may register an account on your behalf (e.g., when a customer administrator sets up user accounts).
Inferences:
We may draw inferences about any of the information in this Section 1 that may relate to your preferences, characteristics, or other matters.
Travel-Related Data:
If you are a user of our travel risk management services, or similar travel- related services, we may process details about your travel plans, including your travel itinerary, accommodation reservations, usual place of work while traveling, and information about your international travel history.
Sensitive Data:
Certain Services (e.g., our travel risk management services and our Nixle Services) may require us to process personal data that may be considered “sensitive data,” or “special category” data, as those terms (or similar terms) are defined under applicable data protection laws, including:
Medical or health data (e.g., allergies, injuries, medications, vaccinations, physical, mental, and dental health histories, pregnancy status, etc.), and health insurance data;
Passport or other government-issued identification number;
race or ethnicity;
nationality or immigration status; and
precise geolocation data (i.e., your precise latitudinal and longitudinal coordinates) (“
Precise Location Data
”), which may be supplemented by “motion data” collected from your mobile device (our use of “motion data” improves our ability to determine your precise geolocation while using less of your device’s battery).
Children’s Data:
If you are a user of our travel risk management services and you plan to travel with your children, we may process information, that you provide us with, about your children, including your children’s names, ages, descriptions, and any plans for schooling and childcare while traveling. We may also process information, that you provide us with, about your children that may constitute “Sensitive Data” as set out above.
Everbridge may anonymize or aggregate certain of the above categories of information so that it is no longer linked or reasonably linkable to you, at which time it is no longer “personal data.” We will not reidentify or attempt to reidentify such information unless we are required by law to do so.
2.  How We Collect Your Personal Data
We may collect the information described above from various sources, including directly from you, from an Everbridge business client with which you have a relationship (e.g., employer-employee), from third parties we partner with, and through cookies or other automated means.
Directly from You:
We collect information directly from you when you provide it to us, including when you contact us via email, phone, text message, postal mail, or on our social media pages, through our chatbot, or communicate with our employees and agents in person; upload Submitted Content to our Platform (including through web forms) or submit it via email, postal mail, or social media); create an Everbridge account; respond to a survey or questionnaire or provide a testimonial; or select or update your communication preferences.
Automatically from Your Device or Browser:
Certain information (e.g., Device Information, Usage Data, Non-Precise Location Data, and (if you choose to enable it) Precise Location Data) is automatically collected from your device or browser when you visit our Platform, open our emails, or interact with our digital advertisements.s.
From Third Parties:
Certain third parties may share information with us that they have collected from or about you, including, for example, data analytics companies, advertising and marketing companies, data brokers, business partners, event and conference organizers, or service providers and vendors that assist with the operation and functionality of our Platform and our business more generally.
If you are a user of a Service as a result of your relationship with a particular Everbridge business client (e.g., employer-employee), we may receive information about you from such business client, and likewise, if you are a family member of an individual who has a relationship with a particular Everbridge client, then we may collect information about you from your family member or the relevant business client.
Using Cookies and Similar Technologies:
Everbridge uses cookies (small files stored on your device or browser), pixel tags (tiny graphic images embedded in a website, app, or email), and similar technologies to automatically collect information when you visit our Platform or interact with our emails or digital advertisements, including, for example, Device Information, Usage Data, Non-Precise Location Data, and Precise Location Data. Through the use of cookies and similar technologies, we may link information about your interactions with our Platform, emails, or digital advertisements over time, for example, which pages you visit, which links or buttons you click, and how long you stay on each page.
We also partner with third-party advertising, marketing, session recording, and data analytics companies (including certain social media advertising partners) that use cookies or similar technologies to collect and/or record information about your interactions with our Platform, emails, and digital advertisements, and your interactions with other websites and digital platforms, and that use and share the information gathered to deliver ads more tailored to your interests. We receive information from these third parties to understand our advertising effectiveness, to provide our Services, and to understand the operation, functionality, and use of the Platform. We may not control personal information once collected by such third parties. The collection and use of your information by one of our website analytics providers, Google Analytics, is governed by Google’s privacy policy, which can be found
here.
Publicly Available Sources:
We may collect information from publicly available sources, such as social media and professional networking sites, and profile pages available on company websites.
3.   How We Use Your Personal Data
How we use the personal data we collect depends on how you interact with us and may include the business or commercial purposes listed below. Where we make reference to the legal bases for processing your personal data, such bases apply only to the extent applicable data protection law requires us to have a lawful basis for such processing and where we are acting to determine the purpose and means of such data processing. Where we process information on behalf of our customers, you should contact them to learn more about their practices.
Performance of Our Services:
We and our service providers will process your personal data for the purposes of performing our Services, including (i) to fulfill your purchase orders (e.g., to process payments, to confirm or update you on the status of your order, etc.); (ii) when you create an Everbridge account, register as a user (as an employee or employer) of our travel risk management, crisis management, business continuity, or contract tracing services, sign up to receive notifications of emergencies, submit an anonymous tip or other messages using our Nixle Service, or seek technical or other support services; (iii) to assess and troubleshoot issues that arise in connection with the use of the Platform and other Services; and (iv) to provide you with access to white papers, webinars, and similar resources.
If you have a relationship with a particular Everbridge business client, or you are a family member of such an individual, we will process your personal data as permitted by our contract with that business client.
We rely on several legal bases for the processing of your personal data for the purpose of providing our Services, as follows:
Performance of a contract
: When processing Account Credentials; Contact Information; Professional and Employment Information; Demographic Information; Payment Card Information, Payment Details and Purchasing History; Travel-Related Data; Sensitive Data; and Children’s Data.
Consent
: When processing Device Information, Usage Data and Precise Location Data collected via non-essential cookies (where such consent is required by applicable law); and, in certain circumstances, when processing Sensitive Data.
Vital interests
: Where it is in your or another person’s vital interests to process the personal data we maintain in connection with our Services.
Legal obligation
: Where we are required to process personal data in order to meet our legal obligations, such as for accounting purposes or the prevention of fraud.
Everbridge’s legitimate interests
: When processing Submitted Content; when drawing Inferences from the personal data you provide. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
below.
Where required by law we will process “special category” data only with your explicit consent.
Communications:
We will process your personal data contained in Call Records, Email Records and Chat Logs in order to communicate with you, including when we respond to your requests and inquiries and when we ask for feedback through surveys, product reviews and testimonials, or other messages.
We rely on the following legal bases for the processing of your personal data for communication purposes:
Performance of a contract:
Where you have made a request or inquiry.
Everbridge’s legitimate interests: Where we ask for feedback. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
below.
Advertising and Marketing:
We may process your personal data for purposes of advertising and marketing our Services online and via email, direct mail, and telephone, and using other communication channels, including social media platforms and internet search engines.
Additionally, if you choose to communicate or provide feedback, reviews, or testimonials, we may use such information for advertising and marketing purposes and to help us improve our products and Services.
Everbridge participates in targeted advertising (also referred to as “cross-context behavioral advertising”), meaning we use third-party advertising companies to display digital ads tailored to your individual interests based on your online activities, as well as to provide advertising-related services such as ad delivery, reporting, attribution, analytics, and market research. We allow third- party companies to collect and process certain information when you visit our Platform and, to the extent required by applicable law, with your consent to our use of non-essential cookies. This information may be used to serve digital ads for Everbridge Services and for the products or services of other companies.
Additionally, if you choose to communicate or provide feedback, reviews, or testimonials, we may use such information for advertising and marketing purposes and to help us improve our products and Services.We rely on the following legal bases for the processing of your personal data for advertising and marketing purposes:
We rely on the following legal bases for the processing of your personal data for advertising and marketing purposes:
Everbridge’s legitimate interests
: Where permitted by applicable law, we may process your personal data in order to contact you for our marketing and advertising purposes because it is in our legitimate interests to promote our Services we think you might be interested in. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled “
Your Privacy
Rights and Choices”
below.
Consent
: Where required by applicable law, we will process your personal data in order to contact you for our marketing and advertising purposes only after you have consented to receive our marketing communications. With your consent, we may also include your name alongside any testimonial you provide.
You can opt-out of (or withdraw your consent to) receiving our marketing communications, or ask us to remove your testimonial from the Platform or our marketing materials, at any time as set forth in the paragraph titled “Additional Privacy Choices” below.
Understanding Our Business Clients and Users and Maintaining and Improving Our
Services:
We may process your personal data in order to analyze your use of our Services and our Services’ performance. For example, we may process the personal data we collect when you interact with our Platform in order to maintain and improve the Platform and to develop new features or services. Likewise, we may keep track of the pages you visit and the manner in which you use the Platform and other Services, including by utilizing third parties to provide ‘heat maps’ and session recording, in order to determine whether to make changes to our Platform or other Services. We may also send you surveys or seek your feedback in other ways. We may, from time to time, aggregate your information and information of other users to help us analyze trends and purchasing patterns and preferences.
We rely on Everbridge’s legitimate interests as the legal basis for the processing of personal data for purposes of understanding our business clients and users; maintaining, changing, and improving our Services; and developing new features and services. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
below.
Personalization:
We may process your personal data in order to record your preferences and personalize your experience on our Platform (e.g., language settings, marketing communications preferences, etc.).
We rely on Everbridge’s legitimate interests and legal obligations as the legal bases for processing your personal data for security and fraud-prevention purposes. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
below.
Security and Fraud Prevention:
We will process your personal data as needed to protect Everbridge, our employees, our business clients and partners, and our users from fraud, security threats, and other illegal or harmful activity.
We rely on Everbridge’s legitimate interests and legal obligations as the legal bases for processing your personal data for security and fraud-prevention purposes. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Right
s and Choices”
below.
Legal Obligations:
We will process your personal data as needed to comply with legal and regulatory requirements and to respond to requests from courts or other governmental or regulatory authorities.
4.  How We Share Personal Data with Third Parties
We may share information with third parties for certain business or commercial purposes. For example:
Service Providers and Business Partners:
We partner with third-party service providers and business partners to assist with many aspects of our business, including fulfilling purchasing orders, payment processing, analyzing our users’ interests and activities, distributing and processing surveys, providing telecommunication services, providing certain functionalities on our Platform (e.g., our chatbot), helping us communicate with our business clients and users, and operating our business more generally.
Business Clients:
If you have a relationship with a particular Everbridge business client (e.g., your employer purchases Everbridge Services on behalf of its employees), or you are a family member of such an individual, we may share your personal data as required by our contract with that business client.
Advertising and Marketing Partners:
We partner with third parties to facilitate the advertising and marketing of our business, including, for example, advertising and marketing companies, digital advertising networks, data brokers, data analytics providers, social media companies, and business partners.
Affiliates or Successors:
We may disclose certain personal data to our affiliates and subsidiaries for their use. Your personal data may also be transferred to another entity that succeeds, or intends to succeed, to all or part of our business in connection with a sale, reorganization, consolidation, or merger.
Other Third Parties:
We will disclose information about you to third parties, including to government bodies or law enforcement agencies, when we believe it to be necessary for compliance with the law or to protect Everbridge, our clients and users, our employees, or the public more generally. For example we may disclose specific personal data if we reasonably believe it is necessary to: (i) investigate any suspected fraud or misuse of the Platform or Services; (ii) protect or defend the rights, property, or interests of Everbridge, our employees, our clients and users, or the rights, property, or interests of our business partners or service providers; or (iii) protect the personal safety of our employees, clients and users, or the public.
At Your Direction or Request, or to Protect Your Vital Interests:
We will disclose information about you to other third parties at your direction or with your consent, or as needed to protect your, or another person’s, vital interests. For example, certain of our Services may include the sharing of your name and contact information with transport providers, medical facilities, and immigration offices. Unless in an emergency (for example where we need to provide information immediately to a medical facility), when we rely on vital interests as the legal basis for such sharing, we will act on your instructions or ask for your consent before sharing your information.
In some cases, third parties may retain rights to process information for their own purposes, and/or subject to their own privacy notices.
Because Everbridge is a global company, the above disclosures of personal data to third parties may involve the cross-border transfer of such personal data, including – with respect to the personal data of EEA or UK residents – transfers to a third country. We may, for example, transfer the personal data of UK, EEA, Australian, or Brazilian residents to third parties located in the United States, and vice versa. For information regarding such international data transfers, including the legal mechanisms for such transfers, please see the section titled
“International Data Transfers”
below.
5.  Your Privacy Rights and Choices
Certain states’ and countries’ data protection laws (including, for example, the data protection laws of the UK, EU, Brazil, and Australia) provide their residents with rights regarding businesses’ use of their personal data (sometimes referred to as “personal information”). Regardless of your state or country of residence, you may contact Everbridge using the instructions set out below to request that we:
confirm whether we’re processing your personal data;
provide you with access to your personal data or a copy of your personal data in a commonly used electronic format (or provide it in that format to a third party at your direction);
request information about third parties with whom your personal data has been shared;
change, update, or correct your personal data;
delete, block, or anonymize some or all of your personal data;
restrict our processing of your personal data; or
opt out of our sale of your personal data or our sharing of your personal data for purposes of targeted advertising (or “cross-context behavioral advertising”).
Where our processing of your personal data is on the basis of our legitimate interest, you may also contact us to object to our processing of your personal data, and, where our processing of your personal data is on the basis of your consent, you may (i) request information regarding your decision to refuse such consent and the consequences of such refusal; (ii) withdraw your consent to such processing; and (iii) request that we delete your personal data after withdrawing your consent.
If you are a California resident, please see the section titled
“California Privacy Rights”
below.
Although the above rights are not always available to every person, we will consider and respond to your requests promptly, and otherwise in accordance with all applicable laws. Furthermore, if you choose to exercise your privacy rights or make the above requests, Everbridge will not treat you in a discriminatory way, nor will you receive a lesser degree of service from Everbridge.
Instructions for submitting requests.
You can make any of the above requests by either visiting our Data Subject Request Page available here
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-individual-
rights-request-form-and-access-procedures/,
or by emailing us at
dsar.request@everbridge.com
and clearly stating the request(s) you would like to make.
In order to help ensure that your personal data is not disclosed to any person who does not have the right to receive it, and to help ensure your personal data is not mistakenly deleted or changed, we will attempt to verify that you are the subject of the personal data you are requesting to access, delete, or correct. We may ask for your email address and about your relationship to Everbridge (e.g., Platform user, client employee, etc.). We will compare the information you provide to any information we may have in our possession in order to verify your identity. We may also contact you at the email address you’ve provided to request additional information in relation to your request. Everbridge will use the information collected through the request process only for verification purposes and responding to your request.
We will confirm receipt of your request within 10 business days. If you do not receive confirmation within the 10-day timeframe, please email us at
dsar.request@everbridge.com.
We endeavor to substantively respond to a verifiable request within 30 days of its receipt. If we require more time (up to another 30 days), we will contact you at the email address you provide.
Authorized Agent.
You may also choose to authorize an agent to make the above requests or exercise your rights. If you use an agent, as permitted by law, we will take measures to verify your agent’s authorization to act on your behalf and we may require more information to ensure proper verification of both you and your agent’s identity and authorization.
Please note that Everbridge may not be able to respond to your request if we cannot verify your identity, or your agent’s identity and authority to make the request, and confirm the personal data relates to you.
Appeals Procedure.
You may appeal our decision to decline your request by emailing us at
dsar.request@everbridge.com
using subject line “DSAR Appeal” and clearly stating the decision(s) you wish to appeal. We will respond to your appeal within 45 days of our receipt of your email, which response will include an explanation of our decision. If you are dissatisfied with our decision on appeal, and you live in any of the following U.S. states, you may contact the regulatory authority listed for that state:
Virginia: The Virginia Attorney General can be contacted
here.
Connecticut: The Connecticut Attorney General can be contacted
here
.
Colorado: The Colorado Attorney General can be contacted
here.
If you live in another U.S. state, you can use the website located
here
to help you find your state’s attorney general’s contact information.
Residents of the UK/EEA
. You may also have the right to lodge a complaint with us, the supervisory authority for data protection issues in the United Kingdom (the Information Commissioner’s Office), or, if you are based in the EU, your member state’s supervisory authority, which you can find
here.
Residents of Brazil
. You may also have the right to lodge a formal complaint with us using the contact information listed in the “Contact Us” section of this Privacy Notice. If we if we fail to resolve your issue within a reasonable period of time, you may petition the Brazilian Data Protection Authority (ANPD) via the ANPD’s website, https://
www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br.
Residents of Australia
. You may also have the right to lodge a formal complaint with us using the contact information listed in the “Contact Us” section of this Privacy Notice. If we have not responded to you within a reasonable period of time, you are entitled under the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) to make a complaint to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (OAIC). You may contact the OAIC via the OAIC’s website,
www.oaic.gov.au,
or by phone at 1300 363 992.
Residents of Countries Not Listed Above
. If you are a resident of a country that is not listed above, you may also have the right under your country’s data protection law to lodge a formal complaint with us using the contact information listed in the “Contact Us” section of this Privacy Notice, or by contacting your country’s data protection authority.
Additional Privacy Choices:
Emails:
You can unsubscribe from our marketing emails by clicking the unsubscribe link in the footer of such email, or by emailing us at
privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
or calling us at +1- 781-373-9800.
Telephone Marketing:
You can withdraw your consent to receive our marketing telephone calls by emailing us at privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com or calling us at +1-781-373-9800.
Direct Mail:
You can request that we remove you from our direct mail mailing list by emailing us at
privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
or calling us at +1-781-373-9800.
Cookies and Similar Technologies:
You may opt out of certain third-party cookies by following your device or browser’s instructions or by using the opt-out tools provided by the following industry groups:
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA):
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI):
http://optout.networkadvertising.org
Please note that cookie opt-outs are device and browser-specific. You may still see targeted advertising from us when using a different device or browser unless you also opt-out using that device or browser.
Furthermore, if you opt out of our cookies, you may experience some inconvenience in your use of the Platform.
Mobile Application Access to Content and Precise Geolocation Data
: If you have consented to our processing of Submitted Content that you’ve provided to us by adjusting the settings in our mobile applications (e.g., to upload photos or documents, or to create video or audio recordings), you can change these permissions (and stop permitting us to access such data) within the settings of our mobile applications at any time. Likewise, you can change the settings in our mobile applications to stop sharing your Precise Location Data and/or “motion data” (which we use to assist us in determining your precise geolocation) with us at any time.
Text Messages
: If you have elected to receive text messages in connection with a Service, you can change your preferences or unsubscribe from such text messages by adjusting your settings within your Service profile or account; replying to an Everbridge text with the word STOP; emailing us at privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com; or calling us at +1-781-373-9800. Please note that we do not utilize contact details provided by users or enterprise customers pursuant to our Services for any marketing or other non-Services related outreach. Mobile opt-in data will not be shared with third parties other than for the purposes of the service.
Testimonials
. When you provide a testimonial, we may include your testimonial on our Platform or in our marketing materials. With your consent, we may include your name alongside the testimonial. You can ask us to removal your testimonial at any time by contacting us at marketing@everbridge.com.
6.  Chatbots
Everbridge has integrated chatbot capabilities into its websites that aims to help users ask general questions and request information about our Services. Your interactions with a chatbot are voluntary. You alone decide whether or not to interact with the chatbot, and what information you disclose to us about yourself when you choose to interact with the chatbot. YOUR CONVERSATIONS WITH OUR CHATBOT MAY BE RECORDED BY OR ON BEHALF OF EVERBRIDGE. Everbridge will use the information you disclose to us via the chatbot, as well as any associated metadata, (i) to respond to your requests and queries, (ii) to analyze, evaluate and improve our products and services, and (iii) for purposes marketing and advertising our Services. We may disclose this information (including the recording of your conversation with the chatbot) as described in the section of this Privacy Notice titled “How We Share Personal Data with Third Parties,” including to the service provider that provides the chatbot functionality. We will retain information collected through the chatbot and the associated metadata for the period set forth in the section titled “Retention” below.
7.  Children
We do not knowingly or purposefully request or collect personal data from children, except as required to provide our Services to such child’s parent or guardian, or to the employer of such child’s parent or guardian. If you believe that such personal data was provided to Everbridge without applicable consent, please contact us at
privacy@everbridge.com.
8.  Security
The security of your personal data and our business clients’ information is important to us. We have implemented safeguards designed to reasonably secure your personal data from accidental loss and from unauthorized access, use, alteration, and disclosure. Unfortunately, we cannot guarantee the security of information provided over the Internet or stored in our databases. Your transmissions are, therefore, at your own risk. You can help protect your information by: being selective about not including sensitive information unnecessarily, selecting strong, unique passwords for your Everbridge account and any associated email addresses, and using security features like single-sign on and multi-factor authentication.
9.  Retention
We retain personal data for so long as reasonably necessary for the purpose for which it was collected (for example, to provide you with Services you have requested), unless we are required by law to dispose of it earlier or to keep it longer. We also retain personal data as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, pursue legitimate business interests, conduct audits, and protect or enforce our rights.
10. International Data Transfers
The personal data that we process may be transferred to and/or stored within our servers or our third-party servers in a country that is different from the country where it was collected. We may, for example, transfer the personal data of UK, EEA, Australian, or Brazilian residents to Everbridge’s, or our service providers’ or partners’, servers located in the United States, and vice versa. Personal data may also be processed by staff who work for us or for one of our service providers or partners in a country different from the country where the data was collected. Certain data protection laws require data controllers to put in place safeguards to protect personal data transferred across borders. For more information about Everbridge’s compliance with data protection laws governing cross-border transfers of personal data from the UK and EU, please review the page of our Privacy and Data Protection Portal titled “Compliance with UK and EU Transfer Requirements” available here
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-transfer-requirements-paper.
EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks
Everbridge, Inc. and certain of its U.S. affiliates participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Additional information about Everbridge’s participation in these Frameworks is available here
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-
data-protection-framework-2/.
11.  Website Terms of Use
Everbridges’ and its subsidiaries’ and affiliates websites Terms of Use are located here
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-terms-of-use.
12.  Links to Other Platforms; Social Media Platforms
Our Platform may, from time to time, contain links to websites owned and operated by third parties (“Third- Party Platforms”). We encourage you to review the privacy policies of such Third-Party Platforms so that you understand how those websites collect, use, and share your information. We are not responsible for the privacy policies or other content on Third-Party Platforms.
If you engage or communicate with Everbridge on a social media platform (e.g., LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter, etc.), we may contact you via direct message or use other social media tools to interact with you. In these instances, your communications and interactions with us are governed by this Privacy Notice as well as the privacy notice of the social media platform you use.
13. Contact Us
We welcome your comments and questions. Please contact us by email at
privacy@everbridge.com,
by phone at +1-781-373-9800, or by mail at the following address:
Everbridge, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Officer
8300 Boone BLVD, Suite 800
Vienna, Virginia
14.  California Privacy Rights
This section contains additional disclosures required by the California Consumer Privacy Act (as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act, and as may be further amended from time to time, and together with all implementing regulations, the “CCPA”).
Personal Information We Collect
. In the preceding 12 months, we may have collected the categories of personal information about California consumers set out in the section of this Privacy Notice titled “Personal Data We Process” above, for the business and commercial purposes described in the section titled “How We Use Your Personal Data” above.
Categories of Sources
. We collected the above-mentioned personal information from the sources described in the section of this Privacy Notice titled “How We Collect Your Personal Data” above.
Personal Information Disclosed for Business Purposes
. We may have disclosed the above-mentioned personal information to the third parties listed in the section of this Privacy Notice titled “How We Share Personal Data with Third Parties” for the purposes set out in that section and the section titled “How We Use Your Personal Data” above.
Personal Information “Sold” or “Shared”
. We may share certain categories of personal information with third parties for marketing and advertising purposes, which may constitute “selling” or “sharing,” as those terms are defined in the CCPA. Such “sale” or “sharing” does not include information about individuals we know are under the age of 16.
In the preceding twelve (12) months, Everbridge may have “sold” or “shared” the categories of personal information listed below with the categories of third parties listed below. For instructions to opt out of this sale or sharing, please see the section titled “
Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
above.
Categories of Personal Information:
Device Information
Usage Data
Non-Precise Location Data
Contact Information
Professional and Employment Information
Demographic Information
Inferences
Other information about you that is linked to the personal information above.
“Shared” with or “sold” to the following categories of third parties
:
Advertising/marketing companies
Advertising networks
Data brokers
Data analytics providers
Social media companies
Business partners
Sensitive Personal Information
. Everbridge may collect and process categories of sensitive personal information as necessary for the provision of our Services. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those set out in Cal. Reg. tit. 11 § 7027(m).
An Explanation of Your Rights
. The CCPA provides California residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. Please see the section of this Privacy Notice titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
above for an explanation of your rights and how you may exercise them. In addition to the rights set forth in that section, California residents may contact us at any time to request that we disclose additional details regarding their personal information, including the categories of personal information, the categories of sources from which the personal information was collected, the business or commercial purposes for the collection, selling, or sharing your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we have disclosed personal information; and the specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you. The instructions for requesting that we disclose this information are set forth in the section of this Privacy Notice titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
above.
15.  Residents of Nevada
If you are a Nevada consumer, you have the right to request that a company not sell your personal data for monetary consideration to certain other parties. This right applies even if your personal data is not currently being sold. If you wish to exercise this right, you can submit a request by emailing us at
privacy@everbridge.com
or writing us at: Everbridge, Inc., 25 Corporate Drive, Suite 400, Burlington, MA 01803, Attn: Privacy Officer.
16.  Residents of the UK and EEA – Article 14 Privacy Notice
Everbridge may, from time to time, obtain personal data from a source other than from the data subject directly (or from a data processor or business partner that has obtained it from the data subject directly on Everbridge’s behalf), including, for example, from event or conference coordinators, lead-generation service providers, and trusted business partners with whom Everbridge engages in cross-marketing opportunities. In these circumstances, Everbridge may obtain your contact information, including your name, title, employer’s name.
“How We Share Personal Data with Third Parties,” and
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
apply to the personal data we obtain in the circumstances set out in this section.
Pont d’Everbridge Avis de confidentialité mondial
DERNIÈRE MISE À JOUR : 14 Novembre 2024
VEUILLEZ LIRE ATTENTIVEMENT CET AVIS DE CONFIDENTIALITÉ
Le présent Avis de confidentialité décrit la manière dont Everbridge, Inc. (ainsi que ses filiales et sociétés affiliées, « Everbridge », « nous », « notre » et « nos ») collecte, traite et partage vos données personnelles, ainsi que les droits et les choix qui s’offrent à vous en ce qui concerne vos données personnelles.
Nous pouvons réviser périodiquement le présent Avis de confidentialité et, dans ce cas, nous réviserons la date figurant en haut du présent Avis de confidentialité en conséquence. Les modifications apportées au présent Avis de confidentialité entrent en vigueur au moment de leur publication, et nous vous encourageons donc à consulter le présent Avis de confidentialité de temps à autre. En outre, le présent Avis de confidentialité peut être complété ou modifié de temps à autre par d’autres avis publiés ailleurs, y compris sur des pages spécifiques de notre Plateforme et lorsque vous utilisez certains Services.
Cet avis de confidentialité est disponible ici : https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-global-privacy-notice.
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-global-privacy-notice
.
Applicabilité de la présente Politique de confidentialité à nos services. Le présent Avis de confidentialité s’applique aux données à caractère personnel qu’Everbridge. Cela inclut les données personnelles que nous recueillons lorsque vous interagissez avec nous dans certains contextes en ligne, par exemple, lorsque vous accédez ou utilisez nos sites Web (y compris, mais sans s’y limiter, www.everbridge.com, manager.everbridge.net, www.xmatters.com, flight-safe.com, www.bestinresilience.com, www.redskye911.com
www.nixle.com
, and www.infiniteblue.com), les sites mobiles, les applications mobiles et basées sur un navigateur, les plateformes et certains produits Everbridge (y compris Everbridge Travel Protector, Everbridge Assist, Anvil Riskmatics, Infinite Blue et Everbridge Business Continuity in the Cloud),  dans chaque cas qui renvoient à la présente Politique de confidentialité (l’ensemble de ce qui précède est collectivement désigné ci-après sous le nom de « Plateforme »), ou lorsque vous communiquez avec nous par e-mail, SMS ou interagissez avec nos publicités numériques.
https://www.everbridge.com/
http://manager.everbridge.net/
Cela inclut également les données personnelles que nous collectons lorsque vous interagissez avec nous dans certains contextes hors ligne, par exemple, lorsque vous nous voyez lors de conférences ou de salons professionnels, ou lorsque vous communiquez avec nos équipes de vente ou de service d’assistance en personne, par téléphone ou par courrier postal. Dans le présent concernant l’Avis de confidentialité, nous désignons les produits et services que nous, à la fois en ligne (y compris via la Plateforme) et hors ligne, en tant que « Services ».
Le présent Avis de confidentialité ne s’applique pas lorsqu’Everbridge agit en tant que prestataire de services auprès de nos clients professionnels (parfois appelé « sous-traitant » ou « responsable du traitement des données »), auquel cas le client professionnel d’Everbridge est le responsable du traitement des données, et nous traitons vos données personnelles conformément à l’accord que nous avons conclu avec ce client professionnel. Si vous êtes un client d’un client Everbridge et avez des questions sur la politique de confidentialité  et le traitement de vos données personnelles par Everbridge au nom de ce client, veuillez contacter directement ce client ou vous réferez à leur politique de confidentialité.
Avis sur les pratiques en matière de protection de la vie privée pour les renseignements médicaux. Veuillez noter que certains services d’Everbridge peuvent impliquer la fourniture de services de soins de santé et le traitement de vos informations médicales. L’utilisation et la divulgation de vos informations médicales dans ce contexte, ainsi que vos droits à l’égard de ces informations médicales, sont décrits dans l’Avis de pratiques de confidentialité d’Everbridge pour les informations médicales, qui est disponible ici,
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-privacy-practices-for-medical
.
Avis sur les pratiques en matière de protection de la vie privée pour les renseignements médicaux. Veuillez noter que certains services d’Everbridge peuvent impliquer la fourniture de services de soins de santé et le traitement de vos informations médicales. L’utilisation et la divulgation de vos informations médicales dans ce contexte, ainsi que vos droits à l’égard de ces informations médicales, sont décrits dans l’Avis de pratiques de confidentialité d’Everbridge pour les informations médicales, qui est disponible ici, https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-privacy-practices-for-medical.
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-privacy-practices-for-medical
Pratiques spécifiques aux services Nixle en matière de données : Les conditions et limitations supplémentaires suivantes s’appliquent à la manière dont Everbridge collecte et traite les données personnelles lorsque vous interagissez ou utilisez les services Everbridge Nixle, qui peuvent être disponibles via des sites mobiles, des applications mobiles et basées sur un navigateur, des intégrations de sites Web, des widgets, des messages et d’autres plateformes (collectivement, le « service Nixle ») (« données personnelles Nixle »). Nous, nos prestataires de services, [et nos partenaires commerciaux], traitons uniquement les données personnelles Nixle à des fins d’exécution du service Nixle, des communications (y compris la réponse aux informations anonymes et autres messages soumis au service Nixle), de l’amélioration du service Nixle, de la personnalisation, de la sécurité et de la prévention de la fraude, et selon les besoins pour se conformer aux obligations légales (chacune étant décrite plus en détail dans leurs sections respectives « Comment nous utilisons vos données personnelles » de l’avis de confidentialité ci-dessous). Everbridge ne :
vend pas les données personnelles Nixle ; ou
partage pas les données personnelles Nixle avec des tiers pour leur propre usage indépendant ou à des fins publicitaires
1.   Données personnelles que nous traitons
Les données à caractère personnel que nous traitons peuvent inclure :
Informations sur l’appareil
: Lorsque vous accédez ou utilisez notre Plateforme (y compris nos applications mobiles), interagissez avec nos publicités numériques ou ouvrez nos e-mails, nous pouvons obtenir des informations sur votre navigateur ou votre appareil (par exemple, nom ou type, version, paramètres, etc.), votre adresse IP, vos identifiants uniques en ligne (par exemple, adresse MAC, identifiants d’appareil mobile, etc.), votre fournisseur d’accès Internet ou des informations sur votre réseau mobile, le nom et la version de votre système d’exploitation,  pages de renvoi et de sortie, ainsi que la date et l’heure de votre visite.
Données d’utilisation
: Nous traitons des informations sur vos interactions avec notre Plateforme (y compris les interactions avec nos applications mobiles), les publicités numériques et les e-mails, y compris les pages que vous visitez et la fréquence et la durée de votre utilisation de la Plateforme, les liens ou boutons sur lesquels vous cliquez, les termes de recherche que vous saisissez, les données de performance et d’autres interactions similaires avec notre Plateforme, les e-mails ou les publicités numériques.
Données de localisation non précises
: Lorsque vous accédez à notre Plateforme (y compris nos applications mobiles) ou que vous l’utilisez, que vous interagissez avec nos publicités numériques ou que vous ouvrez nos e-mails, nous pouvons connaître votre emplacement géographique non précis, notamment en collectant votre adresse IP ou d’autres Informations sur votre appareil. Veuillez noter que, dans le cadre de certains Services (par exemple, nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages), et lorsque vous avez expressément activé une fonctionnalité pertinente dans les paramètres de votre appareil mobile, nous pouvons traiter des données de géolocalisation précises (pour plus d’informations, voir ci-dessous sous « Données sensibles »).
Coordonnées :
Nous pouvons traiter vos coordonnées, y compris des identifiants tels que votre prénom et votre nom, votre adresse postale, votre numéro de téléphone et votre adresse e-mail.
Informations sur la profession et l’emploi :
Nous pouvons traiter des informations sur votre emploi, y compris le nom et le titre de votre employeur, vos qualifications professionnelles, vos affiliations institutionnelles et vos coordonnées professionnelles.
Données démographiques :
Nous pouvons traiter des informations démographiques vous concernant, telles que votre date de naissance ou votre âge, votre sexe, vos informations sur les réseaux sociaux et vos données de profil, ainsi que des informations démographiques similaires.
Préférences :
Nous pouvons traiter des informations sur vos préférences, y compris en ce qui concerne la façon dont vous préférez communiquer avec nous, et si vous souhaitez vous abonner à notre newsletter et à nos communications marketing.
Informations de carte de paiement, détails de paiement et historique d’achat :
Nos fournisseurs de services tiers traitent les informations de votre carte de paiement et d’autres détails de paiement si vous achetez nos Services. Nous pouvons également traiter des informations sur d’autres produits ou services que vous avez achetés ou que vous envisagez d’acheter.
Enregistrements d’appels, enregistrements d’e-mails et journaux de chat :
Si vous appelez, envoyez un SMS, un e-mail, soumettez des questions ou des commentaires via notre formulaire Web « Contactez-nous », ou utilisez la fonction « chatbot » de notre Plateforme pour contacter nos représentants du service commercial ou d’assistance (ou d’autres agents ou représentants d’Everbridge), ou si vous nous contactez via une plateforme de médias sociaux, ou si vous nous contactez via d’autres formes de communication entrante,  Nous pouvons conserver des enregistrements de ces conversations, y compris toute information que vous nous avez fournie dans le cadre de ces conversations.
Contenu soumis :
Nous traitons toutes les données personnelles que vous nous soumettez via la Plateforme, par e-mail ou par courrier postal, y compris toutes les données personnelles partagées dans un champ libre dans vos commentaires écrits, vos avis et témoignages sur les produits, vos réponses à des enquêtes ou d’autres informations, photos ou vidéos. Le « Contenu soumis » comprend également les données personnelles que vous partagez avec nous via les paramètres de votre appareil mobile, par exemple lorsque vous autorisez nos applications mobiles à accéder à des photos, des fichiers ou des documents sur votre appareil, ou à créer des enregistrements audio ou vidéo (par exemple, lorsque vous utilisez notre application mobile pour enregistrer ce qui se passe autour de vous lorsque vous ne vous sentez pas en sécurité).
Informations d’identification du compte :
Si vous créez un compte auprès d’Everbridge, nous traitons les informations d’identification de votre compte, y compris le nom d’utilisateur et le mot de passe de votre compte. Veuillez noter que dans certains cas, votre employeur peut enregistrer un compte en votre nom (par exemple, lorsqu’un administrateur client crée des comptes d’utilisateur).
Inférences :
Nous pouvons tirer des conclusions sur toute information contenue dans la présente section 1 qui peut se rapporter à vos préférences, caractéristiques ou à d’autres questions.
Données relatives aux voyages :
Si vous êtes un utilisateur de nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages, ou de services similaires liés aux voyages, nous pouvons traiter des détails sur vos projets de voyage, y compris votre itinéraire de voyage, vos réservations d’hébergement, votre lieu de travail habituel pendant votre voyage et des informations sur votre historique de voyage international.
Données sensibles :
Certains services (par exemple, nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages et nos services Nixle) peuvent nous obliger à traiter des données personnelles qui peuvent être considérées comme des « données sensibles » ou des données de « catégorie spéciale », telles que ces termes (ou des termes similaires) sont définis par les lois applicables en matière de protection des données, notamment :
Données médicales ou de santé (par exemple, allergies, blessures, médicaments, vaccinations, antécédents de santé physique, mentale et dentaire, état de grossesse, etc.) et données d’assurance maladie ;
Passeport ou autre numéro d’identification délivré par le government ;
la race ou l’origine ethnique ;
la nationalité ou le statut d’immigration ; et
des données de géolocalisation précises (c’est-à-dire vos coordonnées latitudinales et longitudinales précises), qui peuvent être complétées par des « données de mouvement » collectées à partir de votre appareil mobile (notre utilisation de « données de mouvement » améliore notre capacité à déterminer votre géolocalisation précise tout en utilisant moins de batterie de votre appareil).
Données relatives aux enfants :
Si vous êtes un utilisateur de nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages et que vous prévoyez de voyager avec vos enfants, nous pouvons traiter les informations que vous nous fournissez sur vos enfants, y compris les noms, les âges, les descriptions et les plans de scolarité et de garde d’enfants de vos enfants pendant le voyage. Nous pouvons également traiter les informations que vous nous fournissez sur vos enfants qui peuvent constituer des « données sensibles » comme indiqué ci-dessus.
Everbridge peut anonymiser ou agréger certaines des catégories d’informations ci-dessus afin qu’elles ne soient plus liées ou raisonnablement liées à vous, auquel cas il ne s’agit plus de « données personnelles ». Nous ne réidentifierons pas ou ne tenterons pas de réidentifier ces informations, sauf si la loi nous y oblige.
2.  Comment collectons-nous vos données personnelles ?
Nous pouvons recueillir les informations décrites ci-dessus auprès de diverses sources, y compris directement auprès de vous, d’un client professionnel d’Everbridge avec lequel vous entretenez une relation (par exemple, employeur-employé), de tiers avec lesquels nous sommes partenaires, et par le biais de cookies ou d’autres moyens automatisés.
Directement auprès de vous :
Nous recueillons des informations directement auprès de vous lorsque vous nous les fournissez, y compris lorsque vous nous contactez par e-mail, téléphone, SMS, courrier postal ou sur nos pages de médias sociaux, via notre chatbot, ou communiquez avec nos employés et agents en personne ; télécharger le contenu soumis sur notre plateforme (y compris par le biais de formulaires Web) ou le soumettre par e-mail, courrier postal ou médias sociaux) ; créer un compte Everbridge ; répondre à une enquête ou à un questionnaire ou fournir un témoignage ; ou sélectionnez ou mettez à jour vos préférences de communication.
Automatiquement à partir de votre appareil ou de votre navigateur :
Certaines informations (par exemple, les informations sur l’appareil, les données d’utilisation, les données de localisation non précises et (si vous choisissez de les activer) les données de localisation précises) sont automatiquement collectées à partir de votre appareil ou de votre navigateur lorsque vous visitez notre plateforme, ouvrez nos e-mails ou interagissez avec nos publicités numériques.
De la part de tiers :
Certains tiers peuvent partager avec nous les informations qu’ils ont collectées auprès de vous ou à votre sujet, y compris, par exemple, des sociétés d’analyse de données, des sociétés de publicité et de marketing, des courtiers en données, des partenaires commerciaux, des organisateurs d’événements et de conférences, ou des prestataires de services et des fournisseurs qui aident au fonctionnement et à la fonctionnalité de notre Plateforme et de notre entreprise en général.
Si vous êtes un utilisateur d’un Service en raison de votre relation avec un client professionnel particulier d’Everbridge (par exemple, un employeur-employé), nous pouvons recevoir des informations vous concernant de la part de ce client professionnel, et de même, si vous êtes un membre de la famille d’une personne qui a une relation avec un client particulier d’Everbridge, nous pouvons collecter des informations vous concernant auprès du membre de votre famille ou de l’entreprise cliente concernée.
Utilisation de cookies et de technologies similaires :
Everbridge utilise des cookies (petits fichiers stockés sur votre appareil ou votre navigateur), des pixels invisibles (minuscules images graphiques intégrées dans un site Web, une application ou un e-mail) et des technologies similaires pour collecter automatiquement des informations lorsque vous visitez notre Plateforme ou interagissez avec nos e-mails ou publicités numériques, y compris, par exemple, les informations sur l’appareil, les données d’utilisation et les données de localisation précises et non-précises. Grâce à l’utilisation de cookies et de technologies similaires, nous pouvons lier des informations sur vos interactions avec notre Plateforme, des e-mails ou des publicités numériques au fil du temps, par exemple, les pages que vous visitez, les liens ou les boutons sur lesquels vous cliquez et combien de temps vous restez sur chaque page.
Nous travaillons également en partenariat avec des sociétés tierces de publicité, de marketing, d’enregistrements et d’analyse de données (y compris certains partenaires publicitaires sur les réseaux sociaux) qui utilisent des cookies ou des technologies similaires pour collecter et/ou enregistrer des informations sur vos interactions avec notre Plateforme, nos e-mails et nos publicités numériques, ainsi que vos interactions avec d’autres sites Web et plateformes numériques, et qui utilisent et partagent les informations recueillies pour diffuser des publicités plus adaptées à vos intérêts. Nous recevons des informations de ces tiers pour comprendre l’efficacité de notre publicité, exécuter nos services et pour comprendre le fonctionnement, la fonctionnalité et l’utilisation de la Plateforme. La collecte et l’utilisation de vos informations par l’un de nos fournisseurs d’analyse de sites Web, Google Analytics, sont régies par la politique de confidentialité de Google, qui peut être consultée ici.
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Sources accessibles au public :
Nous pouvons recueillir des informations à partir de sources accessibles au public, telles que les médias sociaux et les sites de réseautage professionnel, ainsi que les pages de profil disponibles sur les sites Web des enterprises.
Nous ne répondons pas aux signaux « ne pas suivre » ou à d’autres mécanismes qui offrent aux consommateurs la possibilité d’exercer un choix concernant la collecte d’informations personnelles sur les activités en ligne d’un consommateur individuel et sur des sites Web ou des services en ligne.
3.   Comment utilisons-nous vos données personnelles ?
La manière dont nous utilisons les données personnelles que nous recueillons dépend de la façon dont vous interagissez avec nous et peut inclure les objectifs professionnels ou commerciaux énumérés ci-dessous. Lorsque nous faisons référence aux bases juridiques du traitement de vos données personnelles, ces bases ne s’appliquent que dans la mesure où la législation applicable en matière de protection des données exige que nous disposions d’une base légale pour un tel traitement. Lorsque nous agissons pour déterminer la finalité et les moyens de ce traitement de données et lorsque nous traitons des informations pour le compte de nos clients, vous devez les contacter pour en savoir plus sur leurs pratiques.
Exécution de nos services :
Nous et nos prestataires de services traiterons vos données personnelles aux fins de l’exécution de nos Services, y compris (i) pour exécuter vos commandes d’achat (par exemple, pour traiter les paiements, pour confirmer ou vous mettre à jour sur l’état de votre commande, etc.) ; (ii) lorsque vous créez un compte Everbridge, que vous vous inscrivez en tant qu’utilisateur (en tant qu’employé ou employeur) de nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages, de gestion de crise, de continuité d’activité ou de recherche de contrats, que vous vous inscrivez pour recevoir des notifications d’urgence, que vous soumettez un signalement anonyme ou d’autres messages à l’aide de nos services Nixle ou que vous recherchez des services d’assistance technique ou autres ; (iii) pour évaluer et résoudre les problèmes qui surviennent dans le cadre de l’utilisation de la Plateforme et d’autres Services ; et (iv) pour vous donner accès à des livres blancs, des webinaires et des ressources similaires.
Si vous avez une relation avec un client professionnel particulier d’Everbridge, ou si vous êtes un membre de la famille d’une telle personne, nous traiterons vos données personnelles comme l’autorise notre contrat avec ce client professionnel.
Nous nous appuyons sur plusieurs bases juridiques pour le traitement de vos données personnelles dans le but de fournir nos Services, comme suit :
Exécution d’un contrat
: Lors du traitement des informations d’identification du compte ; Coordonnées ; Informations professionnelles et d’emploi ; Informations démographiques ; les informations relatives à la carte de paiement, les détails de paiement et l’historique des achats ; Données relatives aux voyages ; Données sensibles ; et les données des enfants.
Consentement
: Lors du traitement des informations sur l’appareil, des données d’utilisation et des données de localisation précises collectées via des cookies non essentiels (lorsqu’un tel consentement est requis par la loi applicable) ; et, dans certaines circonstances, lors du traitement des Données sensibles.
Intérêts vitaux
: Lorsqu’il est dans votre intérêt vital ou dans celui d’une autre personne de traiter les données personnelles que nous conservons dans le cadre de nos Services.
Obligation légale
: Lorsque nous sommes tenus de traiter des données à caractère personnel afin de respecter nos obligations légales, par exemple à des fins comptables ou de prévention de la fraude.
Intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge
: Lors du traitement du Contenu soumis ; lorsque vous tirez des inférences à partir des données personnelles que vous fournissez. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Lorsque la loi l’exige, nous ne traiterons les données de « catégorie spéciale » qu’avec votre consentement explicite.
Communications :
Nous traiterons vos données personnelles contenues dans les enregistrements d’appels, les enregistrements d’e-mails et les journaux de chat afin de communiquer avec vous, y compris lorsque nous répondons à vos demandes et demandes de renseignements et lorsque nous vous demandons des commentaires par le biais d’enquêtes, d’avis sur les produits et de témoignages, ou d’autres messages.
Nous nous appuyons sur les bases juridiques suivantes pour le traitement de vos données personnelles à des fins de communication :
Exécution d’un contrat
: Lorsque vous avez fait une demande ou une demande de renseignements.
Intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge
: Où nous demandons des commentaires. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Publicité et marketing :
Nous pouvons traiter vos données personnelles à des fins de publicité et de marketing de nos Services en ligne et par e-mail, publipostage et téléphone, et en utilisant d’autres canaux de communication, y compris les plateformes de médias sociaux et les moteurs de recherche Internet.
Everbridge participe à la publicité ciblée (également appelée « publicité comportementale inter-contexte »), ce qui signifie que nous utilisons des sociétés de publicité tierces pour afficher des publicités numériques adaptées à vos intérêts individuels en fonction de vos activités en ligne, ainsi que pour fournir des services liés à la publicité tels que la diffusion de publicités, les rapports, l’attribution, l’analyse et les études de marché. Nous autorisons des sociétés tierces à collecter et à traiter certaines informations lorsque vous visitez notre Plateforme et, dans la mesure requise par la loi applicable, avec votre consentement à notre utilisation de cookies non essentiels. Ces informations peuvent être utilisées pour diffuser des publicités numériques pour les services Everbridge et pour les produits ou services d’autres sociétés.
De plus, si vous choisissez de communiquer ou de fournir des commentaires, des avis ou des témoignages, nous pouvons utiliser ces informations à des fins de publicité et de marketing et pour nous aider à améliorer nos produits et services.
Nous nous appuyons sur les bases juridiques suivantes pour le traitement de vos données personnelles à des fins publicitaires et de marketing :
Intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge :
Lorsque la loi applicable le permet, nous pouvons traiter vos données personnelles afin de vous contacter à des fins de marketing et de publicité, car il est dans notre intérêt légitime de promouvoir nos Services qui, selon nous, pourraient vous intéresser. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Consentement:
Lorsque la loi applicable l’exige, nous traiterons vos données personnelles afin de vous contacter à des fins de marketing et de publicité uniquement après que vous ayez consenti à recevoir nos communications marketing. Avec votre consentement, nous pouvons également inclure votre nom dans tout témoignage que vous fournissez.
Vous pouvez refuser (ou retirer votre consentement) à la réception de nos communications marketing, ou nous demander de retirer votre témoignage de la Plateforme ou de nos supports marketing, à tout moment, comme indiqué dans le paragraphe intitulé « Choix supplémentaires en matière de confidentialité » ci-dessous.
Comprendre nos clients et utilisateurs professionnels et maintenir et améliorer nos services :
Nous pouvons traiter vos données personnelles afin d’analyser votre utilisation de nos Services et les performances de nos Services. Par exemple, nous pouvons traiter les données personnelles que nous collectons lorsque vous interagissez avec notre Plateforme afin de maintenir et d’améliorer la Plateforme et de développer de nouvelles fonctionnalités ou de nouveaux services. De même, nous pouvons garder une trace des pages que vous visitez et de la manière dont vous utilisez la Plateforme et d’autres Services afin de déterminer s’il y a lieu d’apporter des modifications à notre Plateforme ou à d’autres Services, notamment en faisant appel à des tiers pour fournir des « cartes thermiques » et des enregistrements de session. Nous pouvons également vous envoyer des sondages ou solliciter vos commentaires par d’autres moyens. Nous pouvons, de temps à autre, agréger vos informations et celles d’autres utilisateurs pour nous aider à analyser les tendances, les habitudes d’achat et les préférences.
Nous nous appuyons sur les intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge comme base juridique pour le traitement des données personnelles à des fins de compréhension de nos clients professionnels et utilisateurs ; maintenir, modifier et améliorer nos Services ; et le développement de nouvelles fonctionnalités et de nouveaux services. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Personnalisation :
Nous pouvons traiter vos données personnelles afin d’enregistrer vos préférences et de personnaliser votre expérience sur notre Plateforme (par exemple, les paramètres de langue, les préférences en matière de communications marketing, etc.).
Nous nous appuyons sur les obligations contractuelles d’Everbridge comme bases juridiques pour le traitement de vos données personnelles à des fins de personnalisation (c’est-à-dire le « traitement nécessaire à l’exécution d’un contrat »).
Sécurité et prévention de la fraude :
Nous traiterons vos données personnelles si nécessaire pour protéger Everbridge, nos employés, nos clients et partenaires commerciaux et nos utilisateurs contre la fraude, les menaces de sécurité et d’autres activités illégales ou nuisibles.
Nous nous appuyons sur les intérêts légitimes et les obligations légales d’Everbridge comme bases juridiques pour le traitement de vos données personnelles à des fins de sécurité et de prévention de la fraude. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Obligations légales :
Nous traiterons vos données personnelles si nécessaire pour nous conformer aux exigences légales et réglementaires et pour répondre aux demandes des tribunaux ou d’autres autorités gouvernementales ou réglementaires.
4.   Comment partageons-nous les données personnelles avec des tiers ?
Nous pouvons partager des informations avec des tiers à des fins professionnelles ou commerciales. Par exemple:
Prestataires de services et partenaires commerciaux :
Nous travaillons en partenariat avec des fournisseurs de services tiers et des partenaires commerciaux pour nous aider dans de nombreux aspects de nos activités, y compris l’exécution des commandes d’achat, le traitement des paiements, l’analyse des intérêts et des activités de nos utilisateurs, la distribution et le traitement des enquêtes, la fourniture de services de télécommunication, la fourniture de certaines fonctionnalités sur notre plateforme (par exemple, notre chatbot), l’aide à la communication avec nos clients et utilisateurs professionnels et l’exploitation de notre entreprise de manière plus générale.
Entreprises clientes:
Si vous avez une relation avec une entreprise cliente particulière d’Everbridge (par exemple, votre employeur achète les services d’Everbridge au nom de ses employés), ou si vous êtes un membre de la famille d’une telle personne, nous pouvons partager vos données personnelles comme l’exige notre contrat avec cette entreprise client.
Partenaires publicitaires et marketing :
Nous travaillons en partenariat avec des tiers pour faciliter la publicité et le marketing de notre entreprise, y compris, par exemple, des sociétés de publicité et de marketing, des sociétés de publicité et de marketing, des sociétés de publicité et deréseaux publicitaires, les courtiers en données, les fournisseurs d’analyse de données, les sociétés de médias sociaux et les partenaires commerciaux.
Sociétés affiliées ou successeurs :
Nous pouvons divulguer certaines données personnelles à nos sociétés affiliées et filiales pour leur utilisation. Vos données personnelles peuvent également être transférées à une autre entité qui succède, ou a l’intention de succéder, à tout ou partie de notre entreprise dans le cadre d’une vente, d’une réorganisation, d’une consolidation ou d’une fusion.
Autres tiers :
Nous divulguerons des informations vous concernant à des tiers, y compris à des organismes gouvernementaux ou à des organismes d’application de la loi, lorsque nous le jugerons nécessaire pour nous conformer à la loi ou pour protéger Everbridge, nos clients et utilisateurs, nos employés ou le public en général. Par exemple, nous pouvons divulguer des données personnelles spécifiques si nous estimons raisonnablement qu’il est nécessaire de : (i) enquêter sur toute suspicion de fraude ou d’utilisation abusive de la Plateforme ou des Services ; (ii) protéger ou défendre les droits, la propriété ou les intérêts d’Everbridge, de nos employés, de nos clients et utilisateurs, ou les droits, la propriété ou les intérêts de nos partenaires commerciaux ou fournisseurs de services ; ou (iii) protéger la sécurité personnelle de nos employés, clients et utilisateurs, ou du public.
À votre demande ou selon vos instructions, ou pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux :
Nous divulguerons des informations vous concernant à d’autres tiers selon vos instructions ou avec votre consentement, ou si nécessaire pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux ou ceux d’une autre personne. Par exemple, certains de nos Services peuvent inclure le partage de votre nom et de vos coordonnées avec des fournisseurs de transport, des établissements médicaux et des bureaux d’immigration. Sauf en cas d’urgence (par exemple, lorsque nous devons fournir des informations immédiatement à un établissement médical), lorsque nous nous appuyons sur des intérêts vitaux comme base juridique pour un tel partage, nous agirons selon vos instructions ou vous demanderons votre consentement avant de partager vos informations.
Dans certains cas, des tiers peuvent restreindre le droit de traiter leurs informations à leurs propres fins et/ou dans le cadre de leurs propres avis de confidentialité.
Étant donné qu’Everbridge est une entreprise mondiale, les divulgations de données personnelles susmentionnées à des tiers peuvent impliquer le transfert transfrontalier de ces données personnelles, y compris – en ce qui concerne les données personnelles des résidents de l’EEA ou du Royaume-Uni – les transferts vers un pays tiers. Nous pouvons, par exemple, transférer les données personnelles des résidents du Royaume-Uni, de l’EEA, de l’Australie ou du Brésil à des tiers situés aux États-Unis, et vice versa. Pour plus d’informations sur ces transferts internationaux de données, y compris les mécanismes juridiques de ces transferts, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Transferts internationaux de données » ci-dessous.
5. Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée
Les lois sur la protection des données de certains États et pays (y compris, par exemple, les lois sur la protection des données du Royaume-Uni, de l’UE, du Brésil et de l’Australie) accordent à leurs résidents des droits concernant l’utilisation de leurs données personnelles par les entreprises (parfois appelées « informations personnelles »). Vous pouvez contacter Everbridge en suivant les instructions ci-dessous pour nous demander de :
confirmer si nous traitons vos données personnelles ;
vous donner accès à vos données personnelles ou à une copie de vos données personnelles dans un format électronique couramment utilisé (ou les fournir dans ce format à un tiers selon vos instructions) ;
demander des informations sur les tiers avec lesquels vos données personnelles ont été partagées ;
modifier, mettre à jour ou corriger vos données personnelles ;
supprimer, bloquer ou anonymiser tout ou partie de vos données personnelles ;
limiter le traitement de vos données personnelles ; ou
refuser la vente de vos données personnelles ou le partage de vos données personnelles à des fins de publicité ciblée (ou « publicité comportementale inter-contexte »).
Lorsque notre traitement de vos données personnelles est basé sur notre intérêt légitime, vous pouvez également nous contacter pour vous opposer à notre traitement de vos données personnelles, et, lorsque notre traitement de vos données personnelles est basé sur votre consentement, vous pouvez (i) demander des informations concernant votre décision de refuser ce consentement et les conséquences de ce refus ; (ii) retirer votre consentement à un tel traitement ; et (iii) demander que nous supprimions vos données personnelles après avoir retiré votre consentement.
Si vous résidez en Californie, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Droits à la vie privée en Californie » ci-dessous.
Bien que les droits ci-dessus ne soient pas toujours disponibles pour tout le monde, nous examinerons et répondrons à vos demandes rapidement, et autrement conformément à toutes les lois applicables. De plus, si vous choisissez d’exercer vos droits à la vie privée ou de faire les demandes ci-dessus, Everbridge ne vous traitera pas de manière discriminatoire et ne vous recevra pas un degré de service moindre de la part d’Everbridge.
Instructions pour soumettre des demandes. Vous pouvez faire l’une des demandes ci-dessus en visitant notre page de demande de personne concernée disponible ici https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-individual-rights-request-form-and-access-procedures/, ou en nous envoyant un e-mail à dsar.request@everbridge.com et en indiquant clairement la ou les demandes que vous souhaitez faire.
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-individual-rights-request-form-and-access-procedures/,
mailto:dsar.request@everbridge.com
Afin de nous assurer que vos données personnelles ne sont pas divulguées à une personne qui n’a pas le droit de les recevoir, et de veiller à ce que vos données personnelles ne soient pas supprimées ou modifiées par erreur, nous tenterons de vérifier que vous faites l’objet des données personnelles auxquelles vous demandez d’accéder,  supprimer ou corriger. Nous pouvons vous demander votre adresse e-mail et votre relation avec Everbridge (par exemple, un utilisateur de la Plateforme, un employé client, etc.). Nous comparerons les informations que vous fournissez à toutes les informations que nous pourrions avoir en notre possession afin de vérifier votre identité. Nous pouvons également vous contacter à l’adresse e-mail que vous avez fournie pour vous demander des informations supplémentaires concernant votre demande. Everbridge n’utilisera les informations recueillies dans le cadre du processus de demande qu’à des fins de vérification et de réponse à votre demande.
Nous confirmerons la réception de votre demande dans un délai de 10 jours ouvrables. Si vous ne recevez pas de confirmation dans le délai de 10 jours, veuillez nous envoyer un courriel à dsar.request@everbridge.com.
mailto:dsar.request@everbridge.com
Nous nous efforçons de répondre de manière substantielle à une demande vérifiable dans les 30 jours suivant sa réception. Si nous avons besoin de plus de temps (jusqu’à 30 jours supplémentaires), nous vous contacterons à l’adresse e-mail que vous avez fournie.
Agent autorisé
. Vous pouvez également choisir d’autoriser un agent à faire les demandes ci-dessus ou à exercer vos droits. Si vous faites appel à un agent, comme le permet la loi, nous prendrons des mesures pour vérifier l’autorisation de votre agent d’agir en votre nom et nous pourrons avoir besoin de plus d’informations pour assurer une vérification adéquate de votre identité et de votre autorisation ainsi que de celles de votre agent.
Veuillez noter qu’Everbridge peut ne pas être en mesure de répondre à votre demande si nous ne pouvons pas vérifier votre identité, ou l’identité de votre agent et l’autorité de faire la demande, et confirmer que les données personnelles vous concernent.
Procédure d’appel
. Vous pouvez faire appel de notre décision de refuser votre demande en nous envoyant un courriel à l’adresse dsar.request@everbridge.com en indiquant dans la ligne d’objet « Appel de la DSAR » et en indiquant clairement la ou les décisions que vous souhaitez appeler.
mailto:dsar.request@everbridge.com
Nous répondrons à votre appel dans les 45 jours suivant la réception de votre courriel, lequel répondra avec une explication de notre décision. Si vous n’êtes pas satisfait de notre décision en appel et que vous résidez dans l’un des États américains suivants, vous pouvez contacter l’autorité réglementaire indiquée pour cet État :
Virginie: Le procureur général de Virginie peut être contacté ici.
https://www.virginia.gov/agencies/office-of-the-attorney-general/
Connecticut: Le procureur général du Connecticut peut être contacté ici.
https://portal.ct.gov/AG/Contact-the-Attorney-Generals-Office/Contact-the-Attorney-Generals-Office
Colorado: Le procureur général du Colorado peut être contacté ici.
https://coag.gov/resources/
[CD1]
Si vous vivez dans un autre État des États-Unis, vous pouvez utiliser le site
Web situé ici
[CD2]
pour vous aider à trouver les coordonnées du procureur général de votre État.
https://www.usa.gov/state-attorney-general
Si vous vivez dans un autre État des États-Unis, vous pouvez utiliser le site
Web situé ici
pour vous aider à trouver les coordonnées du procureur général de votre État.
Résidents du Royaume-Uni/EEE
. Vous pouvez également avoir le droit de déposer une plainte auprès de nous, de l’autorité de contrôle pour les questions de protection des données au Royaume-Uni (l’Information Commissioner’s Office) ou, si vous êtes basé dans l’UE, de l’autorité de contrôle de votre État membre, que vous pouvez trouver ici.
https://ec.europa.eu/justice/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
Résidents du Brésil
. Vous pouvez également avoir le droit de déposer une plainte officielle auprès de nous en utilisant les coordonnées indiquées dans la section « Nous contacter » du présent Avis de confidentialité. Si nous ne parvenons pas à résoudre votre problème dans un délai raisonnable, vous pouvez adresser une pétition à l’Autorité brésilienne de protection des données (ANPD) via le site Web de l’ANPD,
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br
.
Résidents de l’Australie
. Vous pouvez également avoir le droit de déposer une plainte officielle auprès de nous en utilisant les coordonnées indiquées dans la section « Nous contacter » du présent Avis de confidentialité. Si nous ne vous avons pas répondu dans un délai raisonnable, vous avez le droit, en vertu de la loi de 1988 sur la protection de la vie privée (Cth), de déposer une plainte auprès du Bureau du commissaire australien à l’information (OAIC). Vous pouvez contacter l’OAIC via le site Web de l’OAIC, www.oaic.gov.au, ou par téléphone au 1300 363 992.
http://www.oaic.gov.au/
Résidents de pays non énumérés ci-dessus
. Si vous résidez dans un pays qui ne figure pas dans la liste ci-dessus, vou pouvez également avoir le droit, en vertu de la loi sur la protection des données de votre pays, de déposer une plainte officielle aupres de nous en utilisant les coordonnées indiquées dans la section « Nous contacter » du présent Avis de confidentialité, ou en contactant l’autorité de protection des données de votre pays.
Autres choix en matière de protection de la vie privée :
Courriels
: Vous pouvez vous désabonner de nos e-mails marketing en cliquant sur le lien de désabonnement en bas de page de cet e-mail, ou en nous envoyant un e-mail à privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com ou en nous appelant au +1-781-373-9800.
mailto:privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
Marketing téléphonique
: Vous pouvez retirer votre consentement à recevoir nos appels téléphoniques marketing en nous envoyant un e-mail à privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com ou en nous appelant au +1-781-373-9800.
mailto:privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
Publipostage :
Vous pouvez nous demander de vous retirer de notre liste de diffusion en nous envoyant un e-mail à privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com ou en nous appelant au +1-781-373-9800.
mailto:privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
Cookies et technologies similaires
:
Vous pouvez désactiver certains cookies tiers en suivant les instructions de votre appareil ou de votre navigateur ou en utilisant les outils de désactivation fournis par les groupes industriels suivants:de désactivation fournis par les groupes industriels suivants :
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) : http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) : http://optout.networkadvertising.org
http://optout.networkadvertising.org/
Veuillez noter que la désactivation des cookies est spécifique à l’appareil et au navigateur. Vous pouvez toujours voir des publicités ciblées de notre part lorsque vous utilisez un autre appareil ou navigateur, à moins que vous ne vous désinscriviez également de l’utilisation de cet appareil ou de ce navigateur.
De plus, si vous refusez nos cookies, vous risquez de rencontrer certains inconvénients dans votre utilisation de la Plateforme.
Application mobile Accès aux contenus et données de géolocalisation précises :
Si vous avez consenti à ce que nous traitions le contenu soumis que vous nous avez fourni en ajustant les paramètres de nos applications mobiles (par exemple, pour télécharger des photos ou des documents, ou pour créer des enregistrements vidéo ou audio), vous pouvez modifier ces autorisations (et cesser de nous autoriser à accéder à ces données) dans les paramètres de nos applications mobiles à tout moment. De même, vous pouvez modifier les paramètres de nos applications mobiles pour cesser de partager vos données de géolocalisation précises et/ou vos « données de mouvement » (que nous utilisons pour nous aider à déterminer votre géolocalisation précise) avec nous à tout moment.
Messages texte :
Si vous avez choisi de recevoir des messages texte dans le cadre d’un service, vous pouvez modifier vos préférences ou vous désabonner de ces messages texte en ajustant vos paramètres dans votre profil ou votre compte de service ; répondre à un texte d’Everbridge avec le mot STOP ; en nous envoyant un e-mail à privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com ; ou appelez-nous au +1-781-373-9800. Veuillez noter que nous n’utilisons pas les coordonnées fournies par les utilisateurs ou les clients professionnels à des fins de marketing ou de sensibilisation non liées aux Services. Les données d’inscription mobile ne seront pas partagées avec des tiers, sauf aux fins du dit service.
Témoignages. Lorsque vous fournissez un témoignage, nous pouvons l’inclure sur notre Plateforme ou dans nos documents marketing. Avec votre consentement, nous pouvons inclure votre nom à côté du témoignage. Vous pouvez nous demander de supprimer votre témoignage à tout moment en nous contactant à l’adresse marketing@everbridge.com.
mailto:marketing@everbridge.com
6.  Chatbots (chatbots)
Everbridge a intégré des fonctionnalités chatbot à ses sites Web qui vise à aider les utilisateurs à poser des questions générales et à demander des informations sur nos Services. Vos interactions avec un chatbot sont volontaires. Vous décidez seul d’interagir ou non avec le chatbot, et quelles informations vous nous divulguez sur vous-même lorsque vous choisissez d’interagir avec le chatbot. VOS CONVERSATIONS AVEC NOTRE CHATBOT PEUVENT ÊTRE ENREGISTRÉES PAR OU AU NOM D’EVERBRIDGE. Everbridge utilisera les informations que vous nous divulguez via le chatbot, ainsi que toutes les métadonnées associées, (i) pour répondre à vos demandes et requêtes, (ii) pour analyser, évaluer et améliorer nos produits et services, et (iii) à des fins de marketing et de publicité pour nos Services. Nous pouvons divulguer ces informations (y compris l’enregistrement de votre conversation avec le chatbot) comme décrit dans la section du présent Avis de confidentialité intitulée « Comment partageons-nous les données personnelles avec des tiers », y compris au fournisseur de services qui fournit la fonctionnalité du chatbot. Nous conserverons les informations collectées par le biais du chatbot et des métadonnées associées pour la période indiquée dans la section intitulée « Conservation » ci-dessous.
7. Enfants
Nous ne demandons ni ne recueillons sciemment ou délibérément des données personnelles auprès d’enfants, sauf si cela est nécessaire pour fournir nos Services au parent ou au tuteur de cet enfant, ou à l’employeur du parent ou du tuteur de cet enfant. Si vous pensez que ces données personnelles ont été fournies à Everbridge sans le consentement applicable, veuillez nous contacter à l’adresse privacy@everbridge.com.
mailto:privacy@everbridge.com
8.  Sécurité
La sécurité de vos données personnelles et des informations de nos clients professionnels est importante pour nous. Nous avons mis en place des mesures de protection conçues pour protéger raisonnablement vos données personnelles contre la perte accidentelle et contre l’accès, l’utilisation, l’altération et la divulgation non autorisés. Malheureusement, nous ne pouvons pas garantir la sécurité des informations fournies sur Internet ou stockées dans nos bases de données. Vos transmissions sont donc à vos risques et périls. Vous pouvez aider à protéger vos informations en faisant preuve de sélectivité et en évitant d’inclure inutilement des informations sensibles, en sélectionnant des mots de passe forts et uniques pour votre compte Everbridge et toutes les adresses e-mail associées, et en utilisant des fonctionnalités de sécurité telles que l’authentification unique et l’authentification multifacteur.
9.  Rétention
Nous conservons les données personnelles aussi longtemps que raisonnablement nécessaire aux fins pour lesquelles elles ont été collectées (par exemple, pour vous fournir les services que vous avez demandés), à moins que nous ne soyons tenus par la loi de les supprimer plus tôt ou de les conserver plus longtemps. Nous conservons également les données personnelles si nécessaire pour nous conformer à nos obligations légales, résoudre les litiges, poursuivre des intérêts commerciaux légitimes, effectuer des audits et protéger ou faire respecter nos droits.
10.  Transferts internationaux de données
Les données personnelles que nous traitons peuvent être transférées et/ou stockées sur nos serveurs ou sur des serveurs tiers dans un pays différent de celui où elles ont été collectées. Nous pouvons, par exemple, transférer les données personnelles des résidents du Royaume-Uni, de l’EEA, de l’Australie ou du Brésil vers les serveurs d’Everbridge, ou de nos fournisseurs de services ou partenaires, situés aux États-Unis, et vice versa. Les données personnelles peuvent également être traitées par du personnel qui travaille pour nous ou pour l’un de nos prestataires de services ou partenaires dans un pays différent du pays où les données ont été collectées. Certaines lois sur la protection des données exigent que les responsables du traitement des données mettent en place des garanties pour protéger les données personnelles transférées au-delà des frontières. Pour plus d’informations sur la conformité d’Everbridge aux lois sur la protection des données régissant les transferts transfrontaliers de données personnelles depuis le Royaume-Uni et l’UE, veuillez consulter la page de notre portail de confidentialité et de protection des données intitulée « Conformité aux exigences de transfert du Royaume-Uni et de l’UE » disponible ici https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-transfer-requirements-paper.
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-transfer-requirements-paper
UE-États-Unis et Suisse-États-Unis Cadre de protection des données
Everbridge, Inc. se conforme au cadre de protection des données UE-États-Unis (« DPF UE-ÉTATS-UNIS ») et à l’extension britannique au cadre DPF UE-ÉTATS-UNIS, ainsi qu’à l’accord Suisse-États-Unis. Cadre de protection des données (« Swiss-U.S. DPF ») tel qu’énoncé par le Département du Commerce des États-Unis. Everbridge, Inc. a certifié au Département du Commerce des États-Unis qu’elle adhère aux principes du cadre de confidentialité des données UE-États-Unis (« Principes du cadre de protection des données UE-États-Unis ») en ce qui concerne le traitement des données personnelles reçues de l’Union européenne et du Royaume-Uni en s’appuyant sur le DPF UE-États-Unis et l’extension du Royaume-Uni au DPF UE-États-Unis. Everbridge, Inc. a certifié au Département du Commerce des États-Unis qu’elle adhère à l’accord entre la Suisse et les États-Unis. Principes du cadre de protection des données (« Principes du DPF Suisse-États-Unis ») en ce qui concerne le traitement des données à caractère personnel reçues de la Suisse sur la base de l’accord Suisse-États-Unis.. En cas de conflit entre les termes de la présente Politique de confidentialité et les principes du DPF UE-États-Unis et/ou le Contrat Suisse-États-Unis. Principes DPF, les Principes prévaudront. Pour en savoir plus sur le programme Data Privacy Framework (DPF) et pour consulter notre certification, rendez-vous sur
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Conforméméent au DPF  UE-Etats-Unis, à l’extension du Royaume-Uni au DPF UE-Etats-Unis et au contrat Suisse-Etats-Unis DPF , Everbridge Inc d’engage à résoudre les plaintes liées aux principes DPF concernant la collecte et l’utilisation de vos
http://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
Plaintes non résolues concernant notre traitement des données personnelles reçues sur la base du DPF UE-États-Unis, de l’extension du Royaume-Uni au DPF UE-États-Unis et du Contrat Suisse-États-Unis. DPF peut être référé à l’American Arbitration Association – International Centre for Dispute Resolution (AAA-ICDR) https://www.icdr.org/dpf, un fournisseur de solutions alternatives de règlement des différends basé aux États-Unis.
http://www.icdr.org/dpf
Si vous ne recevez pas d’accusé de réception de votre plainte liée aux principes DPF en temps opportun de notre part, ou si nous n’avons pas traité votre plainte liée aux principes DPF à votre satisfaction, veuillez consulter https://go.adr.org/dpf_irm.html pour plus d’informations ou pour déposer une plainte. Les services de l’AAA-ICDR vous sont fournis gratuitement.
Si votre plainte n’est pas résolue par nous ou par l’AAA-ICDR, Everbridge, Inc. peut, dans certaines circonstances, être obligée d’arbitrer les réclamations que vous intentez contre elle et de suivre les conditions énoncées à l’annexe I des principes DPF applicables, si vous invoquez un arbitrage exécutoire en remettant un avis à Everbridge, Inc. de votre réclamation et suivez les procédures énoncées à l’annexe I des principes DPF applicables, sous réserve des conditions qui y sont énoncées.
Les filiales américaines suivantes d’Everbridge, Inc. se conforment également au DPF UE-États-Unis, à l’extension britannique au DPF UE-États-Unis et à l’accord Suisse-États-Unis. DPF, et par conséquent, les déclarations, engagements et obligations ci-dessus s’appliquent également à ces sociétés :
Alarmpoint, Inc.
CNL Software, Inc.
Connexient, Inc.
Everbridge Securities Corporation
Microtech USA LLC
NC4 Secteur public, LLC
NC4, SARL
Previstar, Inc.
Red Sky Technologies, Inc.
SnapComms, Inc.
Le Groupe Anvil LLC
xMatters, Inc. (en anglais seulement)
xMatters Holdings, Inc. (en anglais seulement)
11.  Conditions d’utilisation du site Web
Les conditions d’utilisation des sites Web d’Everbridge et ses filiales sont disponibles ici
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-terms-of-use
.
12.  Liens vers d’autres plateformes ; Plateformes de médias sociaux
Notre Plateforme peut, de temps à autre, contenir des liens vers des sites Web détenus et exploités par des tiers (« Plateformes tierces »). Nous vous encourageons à consulter les politiques de confidentialité de ces plateformes tierces afin de comprendre comment ces sites Web collectent, utilisent et partagent vos informations. Nous ne sommes pas responsables des politiques de confidentialité ou d’autres contenus sur les plateformes tierces.
Si vous interagissez ou communiquez avec Everbridge sur une plateforme de médias sociaux (par exemple, LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter, etc.), nous pouvons vous contacter par message direct ou utiliser d’autres outils de médias sociaux pour interagir avec vous. Dans ces cas, vos communications et interactions avec nous sont régies par le présent avis de confidentialité ainsi que par l’avis de confidentialité de la plateforme de médias sociaux que vous utilisez.
13.  Contactez-nous
N’hésitez pas à nous faire part de vos commentaires et de vos questions. Veuillez nous contacter par courriel au privacy@everbridge.com, par téléphone au +1-781-373-9800, ou par courrier à l’adresse suivante :
mailto:privacy@everbridge.com
Everbridge, Inc.
Attn: Responsable de la protection de la vie
8300 Boone BLVD, Suite 800
Vienna, Virginia
14.  Droits à la vie privée en Californie
Cette section contient des informations supplémentaires requises par la loi californienne sur la protection de la vie privée des consommateurs (telle que modifiée par la loi californienne sur les droits à la vie privée, et telle qu’elle peut être modifiée de temps à autre, et avec tous les règlements d’application, la « CCPA »).
Informations personnelles que nous recueillons
. Au cours des 12 derniers mois, nous avons pu collecter les catégories d’informations personnelles sur les consommateurs californiens énoncées dans la section du présent Avis de confidentialité intitulée « Données personnelles que nous traitons » ci-dessus, à des fins professionnelles et commerciales décrites dans la section intitulée « Comment utilisons-nous vos données personnelles» ci-dessus
Catégories de sources
. Nous avons recueilli les informations personnelles mentionnées ci-dessus à partir des sources décrites dans la section du présent avis de confidentialité intitulée « Comment collectons-nous vos données personnelles » ci-dessus.
Informations personnelles divulguées à des fins commerciales
. Nous pouvons avoir divulgué les informations personnelles mentionnées ci-dessus aux tiers énumérés dans la section du présent Avis de confidentialité intitulée « Comment partageons-nous les données personnelles avec des tiers » aux fins énoncées dans cette section et dans la section intitulée « Comment utilisons-nous vos données personnelles  » ci-dessus.
Informations personnelles « vendues » ou « partagées »
. Nous pouvons partager certaines catégories d’informations personnelles avec des tiers à des fins de marketing et de publicité, ce qui peut constituer une « vente » ou un « partage », tel que ces termes sont définis dans la CCPA. Une telle « vente » ou « partage » n’inclut pas les informations sur les personnes dont nous savons qu’elles sont âgées de moins de 16 ans.
Au cours des douze (12) derniers mois, Everbridge peut avoir « vendu » ou « partagé » les catégories d’informations personnelles énumérées ci-dessous avec les catégories de tiers énumérées ci-dessous. Pour obtenir des instructions sur la façon de refuser cette vente ou ce partage, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessus.
Catégories d’informations personnelles
:
Informations sur l’appareil
Données d’utilisation
Données de localisation non précises
Coordonnées
Informations sur la profession et l’emploi
Données démographiques
Inférences
D’autres informations vous concernant qui sont liées aux informations
personnelles ci-dessus « partagées » ou « vendues » aux catégories de tiers suivantes :
Sociétés de publicité et de marketing
Réseaux publicitaires
Courtiers en données
Fournisseurs d’analyse de données
Entreprises de médias sociaux
Partenaires commerciaux
Informations personnelles sensibles
. Everbridge peut collecter et traiter des catégories d’informations personnelles sensibles si nécessaire à la fourniture de nos Services. Nous n’utilisons ni ne divulguons d’informations personnelles sensibles à des fins autres que celles énoncées dans Cal. Reg. tit. 11 § 7027(m).
Une explication de vos droits
. Le CCPA accorde aux résidents de Californie des droits spécifiques concernant leurs informations personnelles. Veuillez consulter la section du présent Avis de confidentialité intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessus pour obtenir une explication de vos droits et de la manière dont vous pouvez les exercer. En plus des droits énoncés dans cette section, les résidents de Californie peuvent nous contacter à tout moment pour nous demander de divulguer des détails supplémentaires concernant leurs informations personnelles, y compris les catégories d’informations personnelles, les catégories de sources à partir desquelles les informations personnelles ont été collectées, les fins professionnelles ou commerciales de la collecte, de la vente ou du partage de vos informations personnelles, les catégories de tiers à qui nous avons divulgué des informations personnelles ; et les informations personnelles spécifiques que nous avons collectées à votre sujet. Les instructions pour nous demander de divulguer ces informations sont énoncées dans la section du présent avis de confidentialité intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessus.
15. Résidents du Nevada
Si vous êtes un consommateur du Nevada, vous avez le droit de demander à une entreprise de ne pas vendre vos données personnelles à d’autres parties contre une contrepartie monétaire. Ce droit s’applique même si vos données personnelles ne sont pas actuellement vendues. Si vous souhaitez exercer ce droit, vous pouvez en faire la demande en nous envoyant un e-mail à l’adresse privacy@everbridge.com ou en nous écrivant à l’adresse suivante :
mailto:privacy@everbridge.com
Everbridge, Inc., 25 Corporate Drive, Suite 400, Burlington, MA 01803, à l’attention de : Responsable de la protection de la vie privée.
16.  Résidents du Royaume-Uni et de l’EEE – Article 14 Avis de confidentialité
Everbridge peut, de temps à autre, obtenir des données personnelles auprès d’une source autre que celle de la personne concernée directement (ou d’un sous-traitant ou d’un partenaire commercial qui les a obtenues directement auprès de la personne concernée pour le compte d’Everbridge), y compris, par exemple, auprès de coordinateurs d’événements ou de conférences, de fournisseurs de services de génération de prospects et de partenaires commerciaux de confiance avec lesquels Everbridge s’engage dans des opportunités de marketing croisé. Dans ces circonstances, Everbridge peut obtenir vos coordonnées, y compris votre nom, votre titre et le nom de votre employeur.
Les autres sections du présent Avis de confidentialité, y compris celles intitulées « Comment utilisons-nous vos données personnelles », « Comment partageons-nous les données personnelles avec des tiers » et « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » s’appliquent aux données personnelles que nous obtenons dans les circonstances énoncées dans la présente section.
Request a Demo